src-fst-morphology-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Verb inflection

The Moksha language verbs inflect in persons.

## VERBS 

* LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-CONJ_AFOLJ  аф:афоль

тумс:ту

BOTH IV and TV

OBJECT and SUBJECT VERBS 

пачкодемс:пачкодь

SUBJECT ONLY VERBS 

андомс:анд

сявомс:сяв

пачкодемс:пачкодь

андовомс:андов

няемс:ня

* MUMS examples:*
* *мумс:* `мумс+V+Inf`
* *муйхтень:* `мумс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1+OcSg2`
* *музе:* `мумс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3+OcSg3`
* *мусь:* `мумс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3`
* *мулезе:* `мумс+V+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3`
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-SC-REMAINDER ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ VERB-ZERO-SC-40/50 ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Use/NG+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-OC2 ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ VERB-ZERO-OC13 ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Use/NG:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й	 IND-PRT1-SC3 ;  This is a difference from ТИЕМС
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@	 IND-PRT1-SC3 ;  

COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Cond:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  
COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+NegCnd:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  

@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ VERB-ZERO-ALL ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Cond:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  
COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+NegCnd:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  

ашень, тят, афоль
сявомс+V+ConNeg **take/ottaa**
* *сяв{ЕОØ}*
* *сяве*

@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-SC ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-OC2 ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ VERB-ZERO-OC13 ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Cond:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  
COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+NegCnd:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  

LEXICON V0_NJAJEMS   няемс:ня
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-SC ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-OC2 ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@@R.CONJ.ObjAll@@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@й VERB-ZERO-OC13 ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й	 IND-PRT1-SC3 ;  This is a difference from ТИЕМС
COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+Cond:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  
COND-ALL
@U.CONJ-INF.NO@+NegCnd:@U.CONJ-INF.NO@й%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  

### AUXILIARY VERBS
LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1_ASHEZJ  ашезь:аш

LEXICON V-AUX-NEG-PRT1_IZJ  изь:изь

FROM MYV

@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@+Ind+Prs:@U.CONJ-MX.IND@@U.CONJ-TX.NONPAST@ VERB-ZERO-ALL ;  This is done here to leave the same ending open for COND-ALL
COND-ALL
+Cond:%>%{ЕОØ%}ндяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  
COND-ALL
+NegCnd:%>%{ЕОØ%}фтяря COND-4CONJ-ALL ;  

ашень, тят, афоль
кирдемс+V+ConNeg **tolerate/kestää** ашень кирде
* *кирдь%>%{АЕØ%}*
* *кирд0%>е*
* *ван%>%{АЕØ%}*
* *ван%>а*
апак Homonymy +Imprt+ScSg2
ваномс+V+ConNegII
* *ван%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *ват%>0т0*
* *кирдь%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *кирт0%>%{Х%}ть*
### INDICATIVE PRESENT and CONDITIONAL (non-past) POINTERS

### INDICATIVE PRETERITE 1 POINTERS

### INDICATIVE PRETERITE 2 POINTERS

### CONJUNCTIVE

### CONDITIONAL and subsequent CONJUNCTIVE

## INDICATIVE TAGS

### INDICATIVE NONPAST TAGS and CONDITIONAL TAGS

### INDICATIVE PRETERITE 1 TAGS

## INDICATIVE PRETERITE 2 TAGS

## DESIDERATIVE (desiderative tag)

## CONJUNCTIVE TAGS
redo conj 2012-11-07 begin

## cond-conj
## CONDITIONAL-CONJUNCTIVE TAGS

## IMPERATIVE 

## IMPERATIVE		(imperative tags)

## PRECATIVE 

end of MYV BORROWING

NON-FINITES 

GERUNDS 

PARTICIPLES 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mdf/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
